test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k9_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: flokkur
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: flokk
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: flokki
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: floks
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: flokkar
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: flokkar
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: flokkum
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: flokka
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: flokkurin
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: flokkin
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: flokkinum
    flokkur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: floksins
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: flokkarnir
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: flokkarnar
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: flokkunum
    flokkur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: flokkanna
